Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB866.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4(3) of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, is amended by adding subclauses to read:Section 4. Schedules of Controlled Substances.--The following schedules include the controlled substances listed or to be listed by whatever official name, common or usual name, chemical name, or trade name designated.* * *1234567891011121314151617181920212223 (3) Schedule III--In determining that a substance comes within this schedule, the secretary shall find: a potential for abuse less than the substances listed in Schedules I and II; well documented and currently accepted medical use in the United States; and abuse may lead to moderate or low physical dependence or high psychological dependence. The following classes of controlled substances are included in this schedule:* * *(xii) Medetomidine, including any compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of the substances referred to in this clause.(xiii) Medetomidine as described in subclause (xii) is not a controlled substance when used in any of the following manners:1. Dispensing or prescribing for, or administering to, a nonhuman species of a drug containing medetomidine that:(A) has been approved by the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services under 21 U.S.C. § 360b (relating to new animal drugs); or(B) is authorized under 21 U.S.C. § 360b(a)(4).2. The manufacturing, distribution or use of medetomidine as an active pharmaceutical ingredient for manufacturing an animal drug approved under 21 U.S.C. § 360b or an animal drug that has been issued an investigation use exemption under 21 U.S.C. § 360b(j).3. The manufacturing, distribution or use of a medetomidine bulk chemical for pharmaceutical compounding by a licensed pharmacist or veterinarians.4. Any other use approved or authorized under 21 U.S.C. Ch. 9 (relating to Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act).5. Another use approved or permissible under Federal or 20250SB0866PN1082 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 State law.* * *Section 2. Section 13.9 of the act, added May 15, 2024 (P.L.364, No.17), is amended to read:Section 13.9. Secure Storage of Medetomidine and Xylazine.--A practitioner who is a veterinarian shall comply with the provisions of section 4(a)(5) of the act of September 27, 1961 (P.L.1700, No.699), known as the "Pharmacy Act," for the storage and protection of medetomidine and xylazine.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0866PN1082 - 3 - 12345678910